Illinois, session 104th, HB3445.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 368d as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/368d)7    Sec. 368d. Recoupments. 8    (a) A health care professional or health care provider 9shall be provided a remittance advice, which must include an 10explanation of a recoupment or offset taken by an insurer, 11health maintenance organization, independent practice 12association, or physician hospital organization, if any. The 13recoupment explanation shall, at a minimum, include the name 14of the patient; the date of service; the service code or if no 15service code is available a service description; the 16recoupment amount; and the reason for the recoupment or 17offset. In addition, an insurer, health maintenance 18organization, independent practice association, or physician 19hospital organization shall provide with the remittance 20advice, or with any demand for recoupment or offset, a 21telephone number or mailing address to initiate an appeal of 22the recoupment or offset together with the deadline for 23initiating an appeal. Such information shall be prominently   HB3445 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10593 BAB 20669 b1displayed on the remittance advice or written document 2containing the demand for recoupment or offset. Any appeal of 3a recoupment or offset by a health care professional or health 4care provider must be made within 60 days after receipt of the 5remittance advice. 6    (b) It is not a recoupment when a health care professional 7or health care provider is paid an amount prospectively or 8concurrently under a contract with an insurer, health 9maintenance organization, independent practice association, or 10physician hospital organization that requires a retrospective 11reconciliation based upon specific conditions outlined in the 12contract.13    (c) No recoupment or offset may be requested or withheld 14from future payments 12 months or more after the original 15payment is made, except in cases in which:16        (1) a court, government administrative agency, other 17    tribunal, or independent third-party arbitrator makes or 18    has made a formal finding of fraud or material 19    misrepresentation;20        (2) an insurer is acting as a plan administrator for 21    the Comprehensive Health Insurance Plan under the 22    Comprehensive Health Insurance Plan Act;23        (3) the provider has already been paid in full by any 24    other payer, third party, or workers' compensation 25    insurer; or26        (4) an insurer contracted with the Department of   HB3445 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10593 BAB 20669 b1    Healthcare and Family Services is required by the 2    Department of Healthcare and Family Services to recoup or 3    offset payments due to a federal Medicaid requirement. 4No contract between an insurer and a health care professional 5or health care provider may provide for recoupments in 6violation of this Section. Nothing in this Section shall be 7construed to preclude insurers, health maintenance 8organizations, independent practice associations, or physician 9hospital organizations from resolving coordination of benefits 10between or among each other, including, but not limited to, 11resolution of workers' compensation and third-party liability 12cases, without recouping payment from the provider beyond the 1312-month 18-month time limit provided in this subsection (c). 14(Source: P.A. 102-632, eff. 1-1-22.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 161, 2026.